Massachusetts, session 194th, H2237.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 112, Section 12E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 official edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and replacing it thereof with the following
sentence:-
A minor twelve years of age or older who is found to suffer from a substance use disorder
by a medical professional may give their consent to the furnishing of hospital and medical care
related to the diagnosis or treatment of such substance use disorder. Such consent shall not be
subject to disaffirmance because of minority.
of 1